Morphology 3/second_task.foma
read lexc second_task.lexc
define Lexicon;

#https://www.study.ru/handbook/mnozhestvennye-chisla-sushchestvitelnyh
define AddE [..] -> e || s | c h | s h | x _ "^" s;

define ReplaceY y -> i e || _ "^" s;

define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define Grammar Lexicon .o. AddE .o. ReplaceY .o. Cleanup;

regex [[{play} "+N" "+Pl" .x. {plays}] | [{goose} "+N" "+Pl" .x. {geese}]] .P. Grammar;
